Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.370

Purchaser to receive written disclosures from operator or department—Exemptions.

Except in a transaction exempt under RCW 19.105.325, any operator who offers or sells camping resort contracts in this state shall provide the prospective purchaser with the written disclosures required to be filed under RCW 19.105.320(1)(b) in a form that is materially accurate and complete before the prospective purchaser signs a camping resort contract or gives any item of value for the purchase of a camping resort contract. The department may provide its own disclosures, supplementing those of the operator, in any format it deems appropriate. The department shall not be held liable for any alleged failure to disclose information or for deficiencies in the content of its disclosures when such disclosures are based upon information provided by the operator or a registrant.

[ 1988 c 159 s 13; 1982 c 69 s 8.]